Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Person" shall include, where applicable, natural persons, corporations, trusts, unincorporated associations and partnerships.

(2) "Trade" and "commerce" shall include the sale of assets or services, and any commerce directly or indirectly affecting the people of the state of Washington.

(3) "Assets" shall include any property, tangible or intangible, real, personal, or mixed, and wherever situate, and any other thing of value.

[ 1961 c 216 s 1.]